Virginia statutes. Title 12.1. State Corporation Commission.
Chapter 2. Members of the Commission.

§ 12.1-6.
Election or appointment of members; terms.

The Commission shall consist of three members. Members of the Commission shall be elected by the joint vote of the two houses of the General Assembly for regular staggered terms of six years. At the regular session of the General Assembly convened in each even-numbered year, one commissioner shall be elected for a regular six-year term.

Whenever a vacancy in the Commission shall occur or exist when the General Assembly is in session, the General Assembly shall elect a successor for such unexpired term. If the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor shall forthwith appoint pro tempore a qualified person to fill the vacancy for a term ending thirty days after the commencement of the next regular session of the General Assembly, and the General Assembly shall elect a successor for such unexpired term.

The Governor shall commission each of the members of the Commission who shall file his commission in the office of the clerk of the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 12-9, 12-12; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 2006, c. 838.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 1.

As to mandatory retirement provisions of members of the State Corporation Commission, see §

51.1-305

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 838 deleted “to begin on February 1 of each year” following “term” at the end of the last sentence of the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 3.

§ 12.1-7.
Chairman.

The Commission shall annually elect one of its members chairman for a one-year term commencing on February 1 of each year.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

§ 12.1-8.
Quorum of members.

A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the exercise of judicial, legislative, and discretionary functions of the Commission, whether there be a vacancy in the Commission or not, but a quorum shall not be necessary for the exercise of its administrative functions.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

§ 12.1-9.
Eligibility and qualifications of members.

No person shall be eligible to serve as a member of the Commission unless at the time of his election or appointment he is a qualified voter under the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth. At least one member of the Commission shall have the qualifications prescribed for judges of courts of record.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-10; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

§ 12.1-10.
Prohibited conflicts of interests.

As used in this section, “member of the immediate family of a member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission” means (i) a spouse of a member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission or (ii) any other person who resides in the same household as a member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission and (a) who is a dependent of a member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission or (b) of whom a member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission is a dependent.

The members of the Commission and its subordinates and employees shall not, directly or indirectly, own any securities of, have any pecuniary interest in, or hold any position with any entity whose rates, services, or financial ability to meet its obligations to the public are subject to supervision or regulation by the Commission; nor shall any such person having a license or certificate to practice law engage in the private practice of law except by approval of the Commission on a pro bono publico basis. If a member of the immediate family of a member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission is employed by any entity whose rates, services, or financial ability to meet its obligations to the public is subject to supervision or regulation by the Commission, the member, subordinate, or employee of the Commission shall recuse himself from and not participate in any regulatory matter at the Commission in which such entity is a party.

This section shall not prevent any such person from being a policyholder in any insurance company; from being a depositor in any bank, savings institution, or similar institution; or from being a holder of a security issued by a unit investment trust or management company as those terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940 and in accordance with such rules as the Commission may adopt.

Any member of the Commission who violates this section may be censured or removed from office in the manner provided by Article VI, Section 10 of the Constitution of Virginia. Any subordinate or employee of the Commission who violates this section may be removed from office by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-13; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1994, c. 181; 1996, c. 77; 2011, c. 163; 2013, c. 94.

Editor’s note.

For the Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 80a-1 et seq.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 163 added subsection A; designated the former first paragraph as subsection B, and therein substituted “entity” for “corporation” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and designated the last two paragraphs as subsection C and subsection D.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 94, in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “having a license or certificate to practice law” and “except by approval of the Commission on a pro bono publico basis.”

§ 12.1-11.
Oath; failure to qualify.

Any person elected or appointed to be a member of the Commission shall qualify by taking and subscribing the oath required by Article II, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia. If any member shall fail to so qualify within thirty days after the commencement of his term of office, such office shall become vacant.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 12-11, 12-12; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

§ 12.1-11.1.
Temporary recall of members.

The Commission may call upon and authorize any member who is retired under the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.) to perform, for a period not to exceed ninety days at any one time, such duties for the Commission that the Commission deems in the public interest for the expeditious disposition of its business.

It shall be the obligation of any retired member who is recalled to temporary service under this section and who has not attained age seventy to accept the recall and perform the duties assigned. It shall be within the discretion of any member who has attained age seventy to accept such recall.

Any member recalled to duty under this section shall have all the powers, duties, and privileges attendant on the position he is recalled to serve.

History.

1990, c. 832.